apertium-en-hi.hi.dix
    <pardef n="चल__vblex_iv">
      <e>       <p><l>ूँगा</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेंगे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ूँगी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेंगी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेगा</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ोगे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेगी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ोगी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेगा</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेंगे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेगी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेंगी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>नेवाला</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>नेवाले</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>नेवाली</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>नेवाली</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ना</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ने</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ूँ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ें</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>े</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ो</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>े</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ें</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>िए</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="stem"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ो</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ता</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ते</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ती</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ती</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>कर</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>के</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ा</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>े</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

     
	<pardef n="रह__vaux_iv">
      <e>       <p><l>ूँगा</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेंगे</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ूँगी</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेंगी</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेगा</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ोगे</l><r><s n="vaux"/>><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेगी</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ोगी</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेगा</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेंगे</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेगी</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेंगी</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>नेवाला</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>नेवाले</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>नेवाली</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>नेवाली</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ना</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ने</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ूँ</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ें</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>े</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ो</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>े</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ें</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>िए</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ो</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ता</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ते</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ती</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ती</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>कर</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>के</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ा</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>े</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ी</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ी</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    

    <e lm="बैठ"><i>बैठ</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="हँस"><i>हँस</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="मर"><i>मर</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="हंस"><i>हंस</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="रह"><i>रह</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="छुप"><i>छुप</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="चल"><i>चल</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="रह"><i>रह</i><par n="रह__vaux_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="सक"><i>सक</i><par n="रह__vaux_iv"/></e>
